Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-159
Joint city and school district facility; city council and board of education; building commission; powers; duties.

The members of the board of education of the school district and the city council of the city of the second class, which board and city council have agreed to build a joint municipal and recreation building or joint recreational and athletic field under sections 17-156 to 17-162, shall be the building commission to purchase the land for the building and to contract for the erection, equipment, and furnishings of the building or the recreational and athletic field. After the completion of such building or field, the building commission shall be in charge of the maintenance and repair of such building or field.

Laws 1953, c. 37, § 4, p. 129;

Laws 1955, c. 39, § 3, p. 153;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 47.